Utah statutes.
63H-6-103.   Utah State Fair Corporation -- Legal status -- Powers.

(1)  There is created an independent public nonprofit corporation known as the "Utah State Fair Corporation."

(2)  The board shall file articles of incorporation for the corporation with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code.

(3)  The corporation, subject to this chapter, has all powers and authority permitted nonprofit corporations by law.

(4)  The corporation shall, subject to approval of the board:

(a)  have general management, supervision, and control over all activities relating to the state fair and have charge of all state expositions except as otherwise provided by statute;

(b)  for public entertainment, displays, and exhibits or similar events:

(i)  provide, sponsor, or arrange the events;

(ii)  publicize and promote the events; and

(iii)  secure funds to cover the cost of the exhibits from:

(A)  private contributions;

(B)  public appropriations;

(C)  admission charges; and

(D)  other lawful means;

(c)  establish the time, place, and purpose of state expositions; and

(d)  acquire and designate exposition sites.

(5) (a)  The corporation shall:

(i)  use generally accepted accounting principles in accounting for its assets, liabilities, and operations;

(ii)  seek corporate sponsorships for the state fair park and for individual buildings or facilities within the fair park;

(iii)  work with county and municipal governments, the Salt Lake Convention and Visitor's Bureau, the Utah Travel Council, and other entities to develop and promote expositions and the use of the state fair park;

(iv)  develop and maintain a marketing program to promote expositions and the use of the state fair park;

(v)  in cooperation with the Division of Facilities Construction and Management, maintain the physical appearance and structural integrity of the state fair park and the buildings located at the state fair park;

(vi)  hold an annual exhibition that:

(A)  is called the state fair or a similar name;

(B)  includes expositions of livestock, poultry, agricultural, domestic science, horticultural, floricultural, mineral, and industrial products, manufactured articles, and domestic animals that, in the corporation's opinion will best stimulate agricultural, industrial, artistic, and educational pursuits and the sharing of talents among the people of Utah;

(C)  includes the award of premiums for the best specimens of the exhibited articles and animals;

(D)  permits competition by livestock exhibited by citizens of other states and territories of the United States; and

(E)  is arranged according to plans approved by the board;

(vii)  fix the conditions of entry to the exposition described in Subsection (5)(a)(vi); and

(viii)  publish a list of premiums that will be awarded at the exhibition described in Subsection (5)(a)(vi) for the best specimens of exhibited articles and animals.

(b)  In addition to the state fair to be held in accordance with Subsection (5)(a)(vi), the corporation may hold other exhibitions of livestock, poultry, agricultural, domestic science, horticultural, floricultural, mineral, and industrial products, manufactured articles, and domestic animals that, in its opinion, will best stimulate agricultural, industrial, artistic, and educational pursuits and the sharing of talents among the people of Utah.

(6)  The corporation may:

(a)  employ advisers, consultants, and agents, including financial experts and independent legal counsel, and fix their compensation;

(b) (i)  participate in the state's Risk Management Fund created under Section 63A-4-201; or

(ii)  procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets, including mortgage loans;

(c)  receive and accept aid or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value from any source, including any grants or appropriations from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or Utah;

(d)  hold, use, loan, grant, and apply that aid and those contributions to carry out the purposes of the corporation, subject to the conditions, if any, upon which the aid and contributions were made;

(e)  enter into management agreements with any person or entity for the performance of its functions or powers;

(f)  establish whatever accounts and procedures as necessary to budget, receive, and disburse, account for, and audit all funds received, appropriated, or generated;

(g)  enter into agreements for the leasing of any of the facilities at the state fair park, if approved by the board; and

(h)  sponsor events as approved by the board.

(7) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(c), as an independent agency of Utah, the corporation is exempt from:

(i)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(ii)  Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(iii)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code;

(iv)  Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code;

(v)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act; and

(vi)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(b)  The board shall adopt policies parallel to and consistent with:

(i)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(ii)  Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(iii)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code;

(iv)  Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code; and

(v)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act.

(c)  The corporation shall comply with the legislative approval requirements for new facilities established in Subsection 63A-5-104(3).



Amended by Chapter 20, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

